District of Columbia statutes.
31-5007

Immunity from liability in regard to statements concerning insurability.

There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against, insurers, any inspection bureau, the Industry Placement Facility, the Joint Underwriting Association, the agents or employees of such bureau, Facility, or Association, or any officer or employee of the District of Columbia, for any statements made in good faith by them concerning the insurability of property: (1) In any reports or other communications; (2) at the time of the hearings conducted in connection therewith; or (3) in the findings with respect thereto required by the provisions of this chapter. The reports and communications of any inspection bureau, the Industry Placement Facility, and the Joint Underwriting Association with respect to individual properties shall not be open to inspection by, or otherwise available to, the public.

Aug. 1, 1968, 82 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 90-448, title XII, § 1208
1973 Ed., § 35-1707.
1981 Ed., § 35-1807.